src/fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Prefixes
Prefixes_01 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< Prefixes_01 ; !sbj = subjunctive
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%< Prefixes_01 ; ! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too? _intention to_

!Lonsdale 2001:211-212
!ɬubələskʷaxʷyildutəxʷčəɬ
!ɬu<bə<ləs<kʷaxʷ>y>il>d>ut>əxʷ>čəɬ
!Fut+ANEW+PgrSttv+help+YI+il+Trx+Rfx+Inc+our
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<las%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ɬu%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Sbj+Hab+Stat
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Hab+Stat
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ʔəsq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb _partly cloudy_ ɬasq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb __partly cloudy in the future__
!ʔəsgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny__ ɬasgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny in the future__
!ʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny__ ɬasʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny in the future__
!ʔəsgəqəb __sunny__ ɬasgəqil __sunny in the future__
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬəs%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬas%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u=bə= Hab+Add (check ordering)
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ƛ̕u%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!bə%<ƛ̕u%< Add+Hab (check ordering)
@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@bə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<tu%< Sbj+Rem
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@gʷə%<tu%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< Hab+Pfv
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< Hab+Rem+Prog
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u%<0%<lə%< Hab+Prog
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;



LEXICON Prefixes_01
Prefixes_01a ;
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%< Prefixes_01a ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01a
Prefixes_01b ;
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%< Prefixes_01b ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< Prefixes_01b ;
!bələhuy: __again/also it is done__

LEXICON Prefixes_01b
Prefixes_01c ;
!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;
!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
 DVNouns_01 ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01c
 Nouns ;
! These are the first Northern Lushootseed
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 DVNouns   ;


LEXICON DVNouns
!@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_01 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
!@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_01 ; !2022-12-25 moved to DVNouns_02-02
 DVNouns_01 ; !
 
!ƛ̕u=s=ʔəs Hab+Nmz+Stat

!ɬu=d=s=ʔaʔ Irr+PxSg1+Nmlz+be.there

LEXICON DVNouns_01
! followed by PX
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%< DVNouns_02-1 ; !remote past, any predicate
DVNouns_02-1 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-1
!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;!CHECKME2022
!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     DVNouns_02-2   ;!CHECKME2022
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    DVNouns_02-2   ;
DVNouns_02-2 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-2
@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !
DVNouns_02-3 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-3
!@U.TAM.NO@:@U.TAM.NO@ Verbs ; 
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
 VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!non-circumscribed, progressive
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me
@U.TAM-A.CONT@:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ləcu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;




LEXICON VERBS_OR_NOUNS
:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}  Verbs ;
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 Nouns ;
 Adjectives ;
 
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Proper noun inflection
!  ----------------------
!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but perhaps with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
        -    Nouns  ; ! perhaps compounding

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Symbol affixes

LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
 +N+Symbol: SYMBOL_connector ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
 +N+Symbol: # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_connector
               SYMBOL_NO_suff ; ! §
          :%:  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §:sne
 +Err/Orth:    SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §esne
 +Err/Orth:%-e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §-esne
 +Err/Orth:%'e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §'esne

LEXICON SYMBOL_NO_suff
 +Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_suff
 +Sg+Gen:n       # ;
 +Sg+Acc:m       # ;
 +Sg+Ill:se      # ;
 +Sg+Ine:sne     # ;
 +Sg+Ela:ste     # ;
 +Sg+Com:ine     # ;
    +Ess:ine     # ;
 +Pl+Nom:h       # ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij      # ;
 +Pl+Acc:ide     # ;
 +Pl+Ill:ide     # ;
 +Pl+Ine:ine     # ;
 +Pl+Ela:jste    # ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujmie # ;
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language verbs inflect time, person and aspect.
! (cf. Hagiwara :7)
! +OcSg1:%>c
! +OcSg2:%>cid
! +OcPl1:%>ubuɬ
! +OcPl2:%>ubuɬəd
! +Oc3:%>d
! +Refl:%>cut
! +Recip:%>agʷəl
! +Mid:%>əb
!

LEXICON Persons
+V+Inf:0    #   ;
+V+Sg1:en   #   ;
+V+Sg2:et   #   ;
+V+Sg3:e    #   ;
+V+Pl1:ien  #   ;
+V+Pl2:iet  #   ;
+V+Pl3:iet  #   ;


!LEXICON COP_
!+Cop:	# ;

!LEXICON TV_BECHDUB
!+TV: 0V_BECHDUB ;
LEXICON V_BECHDUB
 0V_BECHDUB ;
LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB
!! bəčdub:bəčd
+Der/Red2_3L:%^Red123123 0V_BECHDUB_01 ;
 0V_BECHDUB_01 ;
LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_01
!! bəčdub:bəčd
@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_BECHDUB_02 ;
@D.TAM-SUBJ@ 0V_BECHDUB_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_02
@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;
@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;
@D.TAM-HAB@ 0V_BECHDUB_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_03
@R.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@R.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_BECHDUB_04 ;
@D.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_BECHDUB_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_04
@R.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@R.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_BECHDUB_05 ;
@D.TAM-T@ 0V_BECHDUB_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_05
@R.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@R.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@R.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@R.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;
@D.TAM-A@ 0V_BECHDUB_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_BECHDUB_06
@R.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@R.NMZ.V2N@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@R.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@R.NMZ.V2A@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@D.NMZ@ OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON TV_HUYTXW
 V_HUYTXW ;

LEXICON Verbs
verb    Persons   ;
bəčdub+V:bəčd V_BECHDUB "" ;
haydxʷ+V:hayd TV_HUYTXW "" ;
huytxʷ+V:huyt TV_HUYTXW "" ;
labdub+V:labd V_BECHDUB "" ;
ləhaydxʷ+V:ləhayd TV_HUYTXW "" ;
t̕uk̓ʷtub+V:t̕uk̓ʷt V_BECHDUB "" ;
x̌aƛ̕tub+V:x̌aƛ̕t V_BECHDUB "" ;
x̌aƛ̕txʷ+V:x̌aƛ̕t TV_HUYTXW "" ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷ+V:ʔux̌ʷt TV_HUYTXW "" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷ+V:ʔəy̓d TV_HUYTXW "" ;
ʔəƛɬtxʷ+V:ʔəƛɬt TV_HUYTXW "" ;
ʔəƛ̕txʷ+V:ʔəƛ̕t TV_HUYTXW "" ;
ʔəɬtub+V:ʔəɬt V_BECHDUB "" ;
